Massachusetts, session 194th, H1825.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 13D of said chapter 265 of the General Laws as so appears is hereby amended by
inserting after the word "employee" the following words:- to include employees of private
railroads delivering a public service.
of 1